Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1095.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 43 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER CLIMITED ACCESS TO EVICTION INFORMATIONSec.4331. Definitions.4332. Eviction case limited access.4333. Prohibition on disclosure of information in limited access eviction file.4334. Procedures.1234567891011121314151617 § 4331. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Disseminate." The oral or written transmission or disclosure of a court file or any portion of a court file to individuals or agencies other than the court that retains the information."Eviction case." An action brought under Article V of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951."Eviction information." Information collected by the court arising from the initiation of an eviction case consisting of identifiable descriptions and dates of parties involved in the eviction case, documents filed in the eviction case and information or record of activity associated with the eviction case."Limited access eviction file." Eviction information barred from dissemination.§ 4332. Eviction case limited access.(a) General rule.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a court or the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall not disseminate or post on an Internet website a limited access eviction file that is subject to an order for limited access under section 4334 (relating to procedures).(b) Exception.--A court may disseminate a limited access eviction file to:(1) a party to the eviction case, including a party's attorney;(2) a resident of the premises who provides the court 20250HB1095PN1948 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with a party's name or the case number and presents documentation to support a claim of occupancy;(3) a person that, upon a showing of good cause, obtains a court order from a court of common pleas to access a limited access eviction file;(4) an attorney or person acting on behalf of an attorney seeking to review a court file for purposes of providing legal advice, evaluating or representing a party to the eviction case, an occupant of the premises at issue in the eviction case or a person collecting a money judgment related to the eviction case, but in no case for an alternative commercial or business purpose under this paragraph;(5) a nonprofit entity or educational institution seeking court files exclusively for research purposes that are in no way connected to commercial activities. In addition to the prohibitions under section 4333 (relating to prohibition on disclosure of information in limited access eviction file), court files requested for research purposes under this paragraph shall not be furnished by the nonprofit entity or educational institution to any outside organizations and the nonprofit entity or educational institution may not publish any individual tenant names in public reports or other communications; or(6) other parties or entities if the parties to the eviction case agree in writing to the satisfaction of the court that the limited access eviction file may be disseminated.(c) Limited access eviction file.--Subject to section 4334, eviction case information in all cases shall be placed under 20250HB1095PN1948 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limited access after seven years have elapsed since the filing date of the eviction case. THE SOONER OF: (1) SEVEN YEARS SINCE THE FILING DATE OF THE EVICTION CASE, UNLESS OTHERWISE RESTRICTED FROM ACCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH OTHER APPLICABLE AUTHORITY; OR(2) THE ADJUDICATION ON THE MERITS IN FAVOR OF THE OCCUPANT OF THE PREMISES AT ISSUE IN THE EVICTION CASE.(d) Disclosure.--An individual may not be required or asked to disclose information about a limited access eviction file. An individual required or asked to provide information in violation of this subsection may respond as if the limited access eviction file does not exist. This subsection shall not apply if Federal law, including rules and regulations, requires the dissemination of information contained in a limited access eviction file.(E) APPLICABILITY.--THE ELIGIBILITY FOR LIMITED ACCESS UNDER SUBSECTION (C) SHALL APPLY TO EVICTION CASE INFORMATION COLLECTED BEFORE, ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.§ 4333. Prohibition on disclosure of information in limited access eviction file.(a) Prohibition.--A person may not disseminate any information contained in a limited access eviction file. This subsection does not apply to a tenant or other resident in the eviction case.(b) Furnishing information.--A person that regularly and in the ordinary course of business furnishes information to a consumer reporting agency, including a tenant screening service, and has furnished information that the person knows or reasonably should know, is contained in a limited access eviction file, shall promptly notify the consumer reporting 20250HB1095PN1948 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency of that determination and shall cease furnishing information contained in the limited access eviction file.(c) Court order to limit access.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, upon petition of a tenant or on the court's own motion, the court of common pleas in the jurisdiction in which the eviction case was heard may enter an order that the eviction case record at the court of common pleas and magisterial district court is subject to limited access.(d) Vacating an order for limited access.--Upon petition to the court of common pleas which issued the order, and with notice to the opposing party and opportunity to be heard, if the court determines that the order issued under subsection (c) was erroneously entered, the court shall vacate an order for limited access.(e) Disclosure prohibited.--A consumer reporting agency, including a tenant screening service, shall not disclose the existence of a limited access eviction file in a report or communication or consider the limited access eviction file as a factor to determine any score or recommendation to be included in any consumer report, including a tenant screening report.(f) Private cause of action.--A tenant may bring a private cause of action compelling compliance with this section, in which the tenant has the right to recover an amount equal to and not more than two months' rent or $5,000, whichever is less, and reasonable attorney fees.(g) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall prohibit the dissemination of information regarding a money judgment for the sole purpose of collection.(h) Applicability.--This section applies to all eviction case files deemed limited access on or after the effective date 20250HB1095PN1948 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this subsection.(i) Waiver.--The rights and duties enumerated in this section may not be waived by any provisions of a written or oral agreement. Any agreement attempting to limit rights under this section shall be void and unenforceable in the courts of this Commonwealth.§ 4334. Procedures.(a) Case identification.--On a monthly basis, the Magisterial District Court and prothonotary shall identify all eviction case court files eligible for limited access in accordance with section 4332(c) (relating to eviction case limited access) . , UNLESS THE EVICTION CASE COURT FILE IS OTHERWISE RESTRICTED FROM ACCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH OTHER APPLICABLE AUTHORITY. Within 20 days, each court of common pleas shall issue an order for limited access to any eviction case file in its judicial district for which limited access shall be given under section 4332(c).(b) Transmission.--The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall quarterly transmit to an entity that regularly collects and disseminates court records a list of any eviction case file for which limited access has been given and to which the Administrative Office has access. This subsection shall not be interpreted to require the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts to provide or update eviction case file information for cases for which an appeal has been filed with the court of common pleas.Section 2. Within 365 days of the effective date of this section, the COURTS SHALL, WITH THE ASSISTANCE OF THE Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts shall, identify and complete the processing of records that, on the effective date 20250HB1095PN1948 - 6 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of this section, are eligible for limited access.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1095PN1948 - 7 - 12